Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1846
Municipality; duty to make appropriation.

It shall be the duty of each municipality subject to the Civil Service Act to appropriate each fiscal year, from the general funds of such municipality, a sum of money sufficient to pay the necessary expenses involved in carrying out the purposes of such act, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney's fees for any special counsel appointed by the commission when the city attorney or village attorney is not authorized by the appointing authority to represent the commission. The appointing authority may establish the hourly or monthly rate of pay of such special counsel.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 21, p. 137;

R.S.1943, § 19-1821;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1821;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 25;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 129.